Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 6. Air Services Financial Aid

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2003, ch. 210, § 1, and Laws 2003, ch. 211, § 1, both enacted an article 6 in chapter 12 of title 9. The provisions enacted by Laws 2003, ch. 210, § 1, were redesignated as article 7 (§§

9-12-701

and 9-12-702) by the legislative service office and internal references were changed to correspond with the redesignation. Laws 2005, ch. 13, renumbered article 7 in chapter 9 of title 9 as article 6 in chapter 3 of article 10

§ 10-3-601.
Wyoming air services enhancement; legislative findings; Wyoming aeronautics commission authority to contract for services; requirements.

The legislature finds that an adequate and comprehensive system of air service in Wyoming is vital for economic development within Wyoming. Competition among air service providers within the state is virtually nonexistent and, without competition, services will remain limited and unreliable and high air fares will remain a major impediment to use of air services by Wyoming residents and businesses.

The Wyoming aeronautics commission may enter into agreements to provide financial assistance to persons doing business or who will do business in the state, to economic development organizations within the state, to joint powers boards or to other entities formed to provide for enhanced air service to communities in Wyoming that have or are seeking commercial air service, for the enhancement of air services in the state conditioned upon contractual assurances that specified benefits will accrue to the state through increased air traffic and enplanements. For purposes of this article, “enhanced air service” shall include, but not be limited to, assisting airports in the state with commercial air service to have the appropriate level of state or federal security configuration to accommodate proposed air service and aircraft capacity. When entering into an agreement the commission shall give consideration to each of the following potential benefits accruing to the state: increasing the minimum number of enplanements at airports facing a possible loss of federal airport improvement program funding, increasing passenger enplanements at commercial airports in Wyoming, increasing the number of Wyoming passengers originating flights in Wyoming commercial airports rather than airports in other states, increasing frequency or sustaining flight operations from commercial airports in Wyoming to regional airport hubs, increasing the consistency of service, and lowering airfares in Wyoming communities as a result of an air service enhancement grant. The commission shall consult with counties, cities, towns, joint powers boards, airport boards or other entities pursuing air service enhancement before entering into agreements to provide air service enhancement and shall require local funds for the provision of air service enhancement grants. The amount of local funds required for the provision of enhancing air services shall be determined by the commission, taking into account the types of service for which grants are approved, the diverse characteristics of the communities to which air service is contracted for and other considerations examined by the commission.

The commission has primary responsibility and may consult with or delegate to the aeronautics division of the Wyoming department of transportation, Wyoming business council or other entities as necessary, to develop criteria and contracts for financial aid under this section.

All applications for financial aid under this section shall be submitted to the aeronautics commission. The aeronautics commission shall approve or deny the application. The applicant shall be promptly notified of the decision. In making the decision to approve or deny the application, the commission shall give priority to an applicant whereby:

The applicant can provide assurances that the enhancement has a reasonable chance of success and will achieve benchmarks specified by the applicant;

Participation by the commission is necessary to the success of the enhancement because funding from other sources for the enhancement is unavailable;

The applicant will use the proceeds of the financial assistance provided under this section only to secure or enhance air services within the state or to market or promote the service for which the financial assistance is granted;

The financial assistance has the reasonable potential in the opinion of the aeronautics commission to create a substantial amount of air travel originating within the state;

The applicant has already made or is contractually committed to make a substantial financial and time commitment to the enhancement and local funds are provided to secure a financial grant under this section, in an amount determined by the commission;

The applicant will not pledge financial aid granted pursuant to this section as collateral for any other purpose than is specified in the contract between the applicant and the commission;

The applicant will provide reasonable assurances that within a time specified by the commission, the state shall benefit from its investment by means of commercial airports having sufficient enplanements to retain or reestablish eligibility for federal airport improvement program funding and that commercial airports in the state will receive increased revenues from established passenger facility charges as a result of increased enplanements or from other benefits.

Before granting any financial aid under this section, the commission shall enter into an agreement with the applicant providing for a benefit to the state which is commensurate with the level of risk and amount of the financial aid, using the criteria specified in paragraph (d)(vii) of this section. The attorney general shall review and approve the contract before the commission enters into any agreement under this section.

As used in this article, “commission” means the Wyoming aeronautics commission created by W.S.

10-3-101

.

The Wyoming aeronautics commission will establish benchmarks for determining the success of the program.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 210, § 1; 2004, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9–12–701; Laws 2005, ch. 13, § 1; 2007, ch. 120, § 1; 2013 ch. 138, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2004 amendment,

effective March 16, 2004, in (b) added the last sentence; in (d)(iii) substituted “secure or enhance air services within the state” for “cover operational costs or acquisition of aircraft suitable for the special requirements of Wyoming airports,” and in (d)(v) added “and local matching funds are provided to secure a financial grant under this section” at the end; and throughout added provisions authorizing the business council to enter into agreements with the aeronautics commission to investigate applications and make recommendations.

Laws 2004, ch. 120, §
2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, §
8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 16, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which was formerly numbered as
§

9-12-701

, transferring the air services financial aid program from the Wyoming business council to the Wyoming aeronautics commission and modifying its requirements as specified.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added the second sentence in (b); in (d), substituted “enhancement” for “enterprise” throughout,
in (ii), inserted “from other sources,” and deleted “in the traditional capital markets, or because funding has been offered on terms that would substantially hinder the success of the enterprise” at the end, deleted “by the enterprise” following “increased enplanements” in (vii); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the third sentence in (b).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2005, ch. 13, § 3, transfers one full-time equivalent position from the Wyoming business council to the Wyoming department of transportation, aeronautics division to assist in the implementation of and to carry out the provisions of this act. After consideration and planning of the most effective way to implement the provisions of the act, the commission may choose to utilize funding for part-time employment of support personnel or consulting services and other additional assistance.

§ 10-3-602.
Wyoming air services enhancement account.

The commission shall establish and maintain a Wyoming air services enhancement account under this article to provide the financial aid specified in W.S.

10-3-601

to enhance air services within the state. Any funds deposited in the account shall only be expended by the commission as provided in W.S.

10-3-601

and to administer this article.

Any funds appropriated by the legislature to the account established under subsection (a) of this section shall not lapse as provided by W.S. 9-4-207(a).

The commission shall report to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee, the joint appropriations interim committee and the air transportation liaison committee annually no later than September 30, with respect to the status of the program under W.S.

10-3-601

. The report shall include any actions taken and funds expended in consideration of, and pursuant to, any contract entered into under W.S.

10-3-601

, and the performance of any recipient of funds under the contract including measurements of contractual assurances of benefits accruing to the state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 210, § 1; 2004, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9–12–702; Laws 2005, ch. 13, § 1; 2013 ch. 138, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “but shall revert to the air services enhancement account within the highway fund on September 30, 2007” from the end of (b); and in (c), altered the split of the second sentence, added “annually,” deleted “2005” after “September 30,” added “The report shall,” deleted “If any funds are expended under a contract prior to June 30, 2006, the commission shall also report no later than that date and annually thereafter with respect to” after “ W.S.

10-3-601

,” added the language beginning “including measurements,” and made stylistic and related changes.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 13, § 2, appropriates $3,000,000 from the general fund to the Wyoming air services enhancement account to implement the act, and $160,552 from the Wyoming business council and $54,448 from the general fund to the air service enhancement account for administration of the program authorized in the act.